Utah statutes.
72-10-501.   Flying under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or with specified
or unsafe blood alcohol concentration -- Calculations of blood or breath
alcohol -- Criminal punishment -- Arrest without warrant.
(1) (a)  A person may not operate or be in actual physical control of an
aircraft within this state if the person:
(i)  has sufficient alcohol in his body that a subsequent chemical test shows
that the person has a blood or breath alcohol concentration of .04 grams or
greater at the time of the test;
(ii)  is under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence
of alcohol and any drug to a degree that renders the person incapable of
safely operating an aircraft; or
(iii)  has a blood or breath alcohol concentration of .04 grams or greater at
the time of operation or actual physical control.
(b)  The fact that a person charged with violating this section is or has been
legally entitled to use alcohol or a drug is not a defense against any charge
of violating this section.
(2)  Calculations of blood or breath alcohol concentration under this section
shall be made in accordance with Subsection 41-6a-502(1).
(3) (a)  A person convicted of a violation of Subsection (1) is guilty of a:
(i)  class B misdemeanor; or
(ii)  class A misdemeanor if the person has also inflicted bodily injury upon
another as a proximate result of having operated the aircraft in a negligent
manner.
(b)  In this section, the standard of negligence is that of simple negligence,
the failure to exercise that degree of care that an ordinarily reasonable and
prudent person exercises under like or similar circumstances.
(4)  A peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person for a violation
of this section when the officer has probable cause to believe:
(a)  the violation has occurred, although not in the officer's presence; and
(b)  the violation was committed by that person.
